North Carolina, session 2025, HB15.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 9 of Chapter 39 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 39-51. Inclusion of real property in a comprehensive transportation plan not a material
fact.
(a) For purposes of this section, the term "financially constrained" is as defined in 23
C.F.R. § 450.104.
(b) The mere fact that real property, or any portion thereof, is included in a
comprehensive transportation plan that is not financially constrained adopted pursuant to
G.S. 136-66.2 or G.S. 136-212, or in accordance with 23 U.S.C. § 134 or 135, shall not, standing
alone, be deemed material. This subsection shall apply to all of the following:
(1) Offering real property for conveyance, lease, or exchange.
(2) Any other real estate transaction, including those listed in G.S. 47E-1(1)
through (4).
A party to the conveyance, lease, exchange, or transaction, or an agent of any said party, shall
not knowingly make a false statement regarding the property's inclusion on any transportation
plan."
SECTION 2. G.S. 47E-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47E-4. Required disclosures.
…
(b3) The inclusion of real property in a comprehensive transportation plan that is not
financially constrained adopted pursuant to G.S. 136-66.2 or G.S. 136-212, or in accordance with
23 U.S.C. § 134 or 135, shall not be considered a required disclosure as provided in this section,
provided, however, that no person subject to this Chapter, or an agent of a person subject to this
Chapter, shall knowingly make a false statement regarding any such fact. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "financially constrained" is as defined in 23 C.F.R. § 450.104.
…."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to claims for
relief filed on or after that date.
*H15-v-1*